Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Judicial Reviews

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-1001.
Judicial review; temporary relief; conditions.

Any aggrieved party under this act, any person who filed a complaint on which a hearing was denied, and any person who has been denied a variance or permit under this act, may obtain judicial review by filing a petition for review within thirty (30) days after entry of the order or other final action complained of pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

Any person having a legal interest in the mineral rights or any person or corporation having a producing mine or having made substantial capital expenditures and commitments to mine mineral rights with respect to which the state has prohibited mining operations because the mining operations or proposed mining operations would irreparably harm, destroy or materially impair an area that has been designated to be of a unique and irreplaceable historical, archeological, scenic or natural value, may petition the district court for the district in which the mineral rights are located to determine whether the prohibition so restricts the use of the property as to constitute an unconstitutional taking without compensation. Upon a determination that a taking has occurred the value of the investment in the property or interests condemned shall be ascertained and damages shall be assessed as in other condemnation proceedings.

In a proceeding to review any order or decision of the department providing for regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations in accordance with P.L. 95-87 [30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.], the court may under conditions it prescribes grant temporary relief pending final determination of the review proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings were notified and given opportunity for hearing on the request for temporary relief;

The party requesting relief shows there is a substantial likelihood he will prevail on the final determination of the proceeding; and

The relief will not adversely affect the public health and safety or cause significant environmental harm to land, air or water resources.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.51; Laws 1983, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

For judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Editor's notes. —

Public Law 95-87, referred to in the introductory paragraph in subsection (c), appears as 30 U.S.C. §§ 1201 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (a), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Jurisdiction to decide compensatory taking action. —

The legislature has charged the Environmental Quality Council with the responsibility for approving or denying applications for mining permits and until its determination has been rendered, the courts do not have jurisdiction under subsection (b) of this section to make a decision on a compensatory taking action or entertain an appeal from the denial of an application for a permit under §

16-3-114

and W.R.A.P. 12. Rissler & McMurry Co. v. State, 917 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 16, 1996), cert. denied, 519 U.S. 1091, 117 S. Ct. 765, 136 L. Ed. 2d 712, 1997 U.S. LEXIS 532 (U.S. 1997).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Private individual's standing to challenge omission or adequacy of environmental impact statement required by § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)), 62 ALR Fed 337.

Availability of Court of Appeals review, under § 509(b)(1)(E) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1369(b)(1)(E)), of action by Administrator of Environmental Protection Agency in approving or promulgating effluent and other limitations, 62 ALR Fed 906.

What constitutes “issuing or denying” permit for discharge of pollutants within meaning of § 509(b)(1)(F) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1369(b)(1)(F)) which authorizes judicial review of such action by administrator of environmental protection agency, 67 ALR Fed 365.

Award of costs and attorneys' fees in judicial review of administrative proceedings under § 307(f) of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7607(f)), 68 ALR Fed 969.

Construction and application of § 307(b)(1) of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7607(b)(1)) pertaining to judicial review by courts of appeals, 86 ALR Fed 604.

§ 35-11-1002.
Publication of rules and regulations.

Any rule, regulation or standard promulgated under this act shall be published and distributed to members of the legislature and any other interested party.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.52.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).